Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB146.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 75-3369a is hereby amended to read as follows: 75-
3369a. (a) The secretary of social and rehabilitation services shall convey,
without consideration, to the city of Osawatomie, Kansas, the following
described tracts of real estate located in Miami county, Kansas:
TRACT 1
That portion of the East Half (E 1/) of the Southwest Quarter (SW 1/)
4
of Section 1, Township 18 South, Range 22 East of the Sixth Principal
Meridian, Miami County, Kansas lying East of US 169 Highway and
South of 343rd Street, being more particularly described as follows:
Commencing at the Northeast corner of the East Half (E 1/) of said

Southwest Quarter (SW 1/); Thence South 02 Degrees 18 Minutes 25

Seconds West (Assumed Bearings based on the Kansas State Plane
Coordinate System) along the East line of said East Half (E 1/) a distance

of 1074.10 feet to the intersection with the Northerly right-of-way of K
279 Highway, said intersection being the point of beginning; Thence
continuing South 02 Degrees 18 Minutes 25 Seconds West along said East
line a distance of 1582.50 feet to the Southeast corner of said East Half (E
1/); Thence South 89 Degrees 29 Minutes 17 Seconds West along the

South line of said East Half (E 1/) a distance of 1012.35 feet to a point on

the Easterly right-of-way of US Highway 169, said point being 315.60 feet
East of the Southwest corner of said East Half (E 1/); Thence North 17

Degrees 40 Minutes 40 Seconds East along said Easterly right-of-way a
distance of 576.70 feet to the beginning of a curve to the right having a
radius of 4183.22 feet; Thence Northeasterly along said right-of-way along
said curve an arc distance of 473.35, chord to said curve being 473.10 feet
on a bearing of North 20 Degrees 55 Minutes 40 Seconds West; Thence

SB 146 2
North 32 Degrees 08 Minutes 40 Seconds East along said right-of-way a
distance of 249.54 feet; Thence North 46 Degrees 00 Minutes 27 Seconds
East along said right-of-way a distance of 596.07 feet to the Southerly
right-of-way of K 279 Highway; Thence South 58 Degrees 23 Minutes 59
Seconds East along said right-of-way a distance of 50.36 feet to the point
of beginning.
AND
That portion of the South Half (S 1/) of the Southeast Quarter (SE 1/)
4
and that part of the South Half (S 1/) of the North Half (N 1/) of the
2
Southeast Quarter (SE 1/) of Section 1, Township 18 South, Range 22 East

of the Sixth Principal Meridian, Miami County, Kansas lying South and
West of K 279 Highway, being more particularly described as follows:
Commencing at the Northwest corner of said Southeast Quarter (SE
1/); Thence South 02 Degrees 18 Minutes 25 Seconds West (Assumed

Bearings based on the Kansas State Plane Coordinate System) along the
East line of said East Half (E 1/) a distance of 1074.10 feet to the

intersection with the Southerly right-of-way of K 279 Highway, said
intersection being the point of beginning; Thence South 58 Degrees 17
Minutes 25 Seconds East along said right-of-way a distance of 180.20 feet
to the beginning of a curve to the right having a radius of 1050.91 feet;
Thence Southeasterly along said right-of-way along said curve an arc
length of 747.14 feet, chord to said curve being 731.50 feet on a bearing of
South 32 Degrees 04 Minutes 25 Seconds East; Thence South 11 Degrees
42 Minutes 25 Seconds East along said right-of-way a distance of 204.70
feet to the beginning of a curve to the left having a radius of 913.51;
Thence Southeasterly along said right-of-way along said curve an arc
distance of 732.25 feet, chord to said curve being 712.80 feet on a bearing
of South 34 Degrees 40 Minutes 25 Seconds East; Thence South 20
Degrees 14 Minutes 25 Seconds East along said right-of-way a distance of
36.00 feet; Thence South 02 Degrees 12 Minutes 42 Seconds West a
distance of 23.55 feet to a point on the South line being 936.90 feet East of
the Southwest corner of said Southeast Quarter (SE 1/); Thence South 88

Degrees 36 Minutes 43 Seconds West along the South line of said
Southeast Quarter (SE 1/) a distance of 936.90 feet to the Southwest

corner of said Southeast Quarter (SE 1/); Thence North 02 Degrees 18

Minutes 25 Seconds West along the West line of said Southwest Quarter
(SW 1/) a distance of 1582.50 feet to the point of beginning.

AND
That portion of the South Half (S 1/) of the Southeast Quarter (SE 1/)
4
and that part of the South Half (S 1/) of the North Half (N 1/) of the
2
Southeast Quarter (SE 1/) of Section 1, Township 18 South, Range 22 East

of the Sixth Principal Meridian, Miami County, Kansas lying North and
East of K 279 Highway and East of US Highway 169, being more

SB 146 3
particularly described as follows:
Commencing at the Southeast corner of the Southeast Quarter (SE 1/)

of said Section 2; Thence South 88 Degrees 36 Minutes 43 Seconds West
(Assumed Bearings based on the Kansas State Plane Coordinate System)
along the South line of said Southeast Quarter (SE 1/) a distance of 763.57

feet to the point of beginning; Thence North 01 Degree 24 Minutes 25
Seconds West perpendicular to said South line a distance of 25.00 feet;
Thence North 88 Degrees 36 Minutes 43 Seconds East parallel with said
South line a distance of 718.25 feet to a point being 45.00 feet West of the
East line of said Southeast Quarter (SE 1/); Thence North 01 Degree 47

Minutes 48 Seconds West parallel with said East line a distance of 84.68
feet; Thence North 88 Degrees 12 Minutes 12 Seconds East perpendicular
to the East line of said Southeast Quarter (SE 1/) a distance of 45.00 feet

to a point on said East line being 130.00 feet North of the Southeast corner
of said Southeast Quarter (SE 1/); Thence North 01 Degree 47 Minutes 48

Seconds West along said East line a distance of 1842.98 feet to the
Northeast corner of the South Half (S 1/) of the North Half (N 1/) of said
2
Southeast Quarter (SE 1/); Thence South 89 Degrees 01 Minute 29

Seconds West along the North line of the South Half (S 1/) of the North

Half (N 1/) of said Southeast Quarter (SE 1/) a distance of 2406.39 feet to
4
the intersection with the Easterly right-of-way of US Highway 69; Thence
South 36 Degrees 15 Minutes 01 Second West along said right-of-way a
distance of 278.07 feet to the Northerly right-of-way of K 279 Highway;
Thence South 47 Degrees 21 Minutes 25 Seconds East along said K 279
right-of-way a distance of 225.50 feet to the beginning of a curve to the
right having a radius of 1215.91 feet; Thence Southeasterly along said
right-of-way along said curve an arc distance of 610.49 feet, chord to said
curve being 604.10 feet on a bearing of South 38 Degrees 03 Minutes 25
Seconds East; Thence South 24 Degrees 34 Minutes 25 Seconds East
along said right-of-way a distance of 320.80 feet; Thence South 00
Degrees 46 Minutes 35 Seconds West along said right-of-way a distance of
199.90 feet to the beginning of a curve to the left having a radius of 748.51
feet; Thence Southeasterly along said right-of-way along said curve an arc
distance of 989.75 feet, chord to said curve being 919.20 feet on a bearing
of South 53 Degrees 31 Minutes 25 Seconds East; Thence South 79
Degrees 43 Minutes 25 Seconds East along said right-of-way a distance of
222.30 feet; Thence South 01 Degree 24 Minutes 25 Seconds East a
distance of 25.00 feet to a point on the South line being 1650.60 feet East
of the Southwest corner of said Southeast Quarter (SE 1/); Thence North

88 Degrees 36 Minutes 43 Seconds East along said South line a distance of
241.60 feet to the point of beginning.
TRACT 2
That part of the West Half of the Northwest Quarter of Section 1,

SB 146 4
Township 18 South, Range 22 East of the Sixth Principal Meridian, Miami
County, Kansas described as follows:
Beginning at the Northwest Corner of said Northwest Quarter; thence
along the north line of said Northwest Quarter on an assumed bearing of
N88°30'16"E, 1323.45 feet to the northeast corner of said West Half;
thence along the east line of said West Half S01°58'38"E, 2319.05 feet to a
point being a perpendicular distance of 275.00 feet north of the south line
of said Northwest Quarter; thence parallel with said south line
S89°09'21"W, 801.13 feet; thence N21°23'10"W, 109.33 feet to a point
being a perpendicular distance of 485.00 feet east of the west line of said
Northwest Quarter; thence parallel with said west line N02°00'20"W,
892.81 feet to a point being a perpendicular distance of 1270.00 feet north
of the south line of said Northwest Quarter; thence parallel with said south
line S89°09'21"W, 485.10 feet to west line of said Northwest Quarter;
thence along said west line N02°00'20"W, 1308.83 feet to the point of
beginning.
TRACT 3
The Southwest Quarter (1/) of the Southwest Quarter, also the East half

(1/) of the Northwest Quarter (1/) of the Southwest Quarter (1/) of Section
4 4
Thirty-six (36), in Township Seventeen (17) South, Range Twenty-two
(22) East, Miami County, Kansas.
TRACT 4
The South one half (1/) of the Southeast Quarter (1/) of Section Thirty-
4
five (35), Township Seventeen (17) South, Range Twenty-two (22) East,
Miami County, Kansas.
(b) The deed conveying the real estate described under subsection (a)
shall be approved by the attorney general and shall be executed by the
secretary of the department of social and rehabilitation services. The deed
for the conveyance shall provide that on July 1, 2026, that in the event that
any portion of the above-described real estate has not been used for
economic development, then all right, title and interest in such portion of
such real estate shall revert to the state of Kansas. The deed for the
conveyance may be by warranty deed or by quitclaim deed as determined
to be in the best interests of the state by the attorney general in
consultation with the secretary of social and rehabilitation services.
(c) The conveyance authorized by this section shall not be subject to
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-3043a or K.S.A. 75-6609 or 75-6610, and
amendments thereto.
(d) On or before July 1, 2026, the secretary for aging and disability
services on behalf of the state of Kansas and the city of Osawatomie,
Kansas, shall execute and record an amendment to the original deed for
the conveyance authorized by this section. Such amendment to the deed
shall provide that the reversionary interest described in subsection (b) be

SB 146 5
amended such that on July 1, 2046, in the event that any portion of the
real estate described in subsection (a) has not been used for economic
development, then all right, title and interest in such portion of such real
estate shall revert to the state of Kansas. In the event that the secretary for
aging and disability services determines that the legal description of the
property described by this section is incorrect, the secretary for aging and
disability services may execute and record such amendment to the deed
utilizing the correct legal description but the amendment to the deed shall
be subject to the approval of the attorney general.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 75-3369a is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.